incubator/apertium-ina/apertium-ina.ina.dix
    <pardef n="/esser__vbser"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esser</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esse</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>son</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>so</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>somos</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esseva</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esserea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>serea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essente</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essete</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ubi__rel"> 
      <e><p><l/>                    <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="como__adv"> 
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef> 
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="ubi__rel"/></e>
